North Carolina, session 2025, SB656.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. EXEMPTIONS FROM COSMETIC ART LICENSING REQUIREMENTS AND
CONVERSION TO VOLUNTARY CERTIFICATION FOR NATURAL HAIR CARE
SPECIALISTS
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 88B-2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-2. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
(1) Apprentice. – A person who is not a manager or operator and who is engaged
in learning the practice of cosmetic art under the direction and supervision of
a cosmetologist.
(1a) Blow-dry styling. – The act of shampooing, conditioning, drying, arranging,
curling, straightening, or styling hair using only mechanical devices, hair
sprays, and topical agents, such as balms, oils, serums, and providing no other
services requiring a license under this Chapter. This term includes the use and
styling of wigs, hair pieces, and extensions. This term does not include the use
of chemicals to alter the structure of the hair and haircutting.
(2) Board. – The North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art Examiners.
(3) Booth. – A workstation located within a licensed cosmetic art shop that is
operated primarily by one individual in performing cosmetic art services for
consumers.
(4) Booth renter. – A person who rents a booth in a cosmetic art shop.
(4a) Certified natural hair care specialist. – An individual certified by the Board to
practice only the part of cosmetic art that constitutes natural hair care, as
defined in this section. Certification shall not be required by the Board to
practice natural hair care, but an individual who meets the credentials for the
certificate may apply to the Board for certification.
(5) Cosmetic art. – All or any part or combination of cosmetology, esthetics,
natural hair care, or manicuring, including the systematic manipulation with
*S656-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the hands or mechanical apparatus of the scalp, face, neck, shoulders, hands,
and feet. Practices included within this subdivision shall not include the
practice of massage or bodywork therapy as set forth in Article 36 of Chapter
90 of the General Statutes.
(6) Cosmetic art school. – Any building or part thereof where cosmetic art is
taught.
(7) Cosmetic art shop. – Any building or part thereof where cosmetic art is
practiced for pay or reward, whether direct or indirect.
(8) Cosmetologist. – Any individual who is licensed to practice all parts of
cosmetic art.
(8a) Cosmetology. – The act of arranging, dressing, curling, waving, cleansing,
cutting, singeing, bleaching, coloring, or similar work upon the hair of a
person by any means, including the use of hands, mechanical or electrical
apparatus, or appliances or by use of cosmetic or chemical preparations or
antiseptics.
(9) Cosmetology teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach all parts
of cosmetic art.
(10) Esthetician. – An individual licensed by the Board to practice only that part of
cosmetic art that constitutes skin care.
(11) Esthetician teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach only that
part of cosmetic art that constitutes skin care.
(11a) Esthetics. – Refers to any of the following practices: giving facials; applying
makeup; performing skin care; removing superfluous hair from the body of a
person by use of creams, tweezers, or waxing; applying eyelashes to a person,
including the application of eyelash extensions, brow or lash color;
beautifying the face, neck, arms, or upper part of the human body by use of
cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams; surface
manipulation in relation to skin care; or cleaning or stimulating the face, neck,
ears, arms, hands, bust, torso, legs, or feet of a person by means of hands,
devices, apparatus, or appliances along with the use of cosmetic preparations,
antiseptics, tonics, lotions, or creams.
(12) Manicuring. – The care and treatment of the fingernails, toenails, cuticles on
fingernails and toenails, and the hands and feet, including the decoration of
the fingernails and the application of nail extensions and artificial nails. The
term "manicuring" shall not include the treatment of pathologic conditions.
(13) Manicurist. – An individual licensed by the Board to practice only that part of
cosmetic art that constitutes manicuring.
(14) Manicurist teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach
manicuring.
(14a) Natural hair care. – A service that results in tension on hair strands or roots by
twisting, wrapping, extending, or locking hair by hand or mechanical device.
For purposes of this definition, the phrase "natural hair care" shall include the
use of artificial or natural hair.
(14b) Natural hair care specialist. – An individual licensed by the Board to practice
only that part of cosmetic art that constitutes natural hair care.
(14c) Natural hair care teacher. – An individual licensed by the Board to teach
natural hair care.
(14d) Makeup artistry – The application of a cosmetic to enhance the appearance of
the face or skin using powder, foundation, rouge, eyeshadow, eyeliner,
mascara, or lipstick when providing no other services requiring a license under
Page 2 Senate Bill 656-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
this Chapter. This term includes the use of an airbrush to apply makeup and
excludes the application of permanent makeup or tattooing.
(15) Shampooing. – The application and removal of commonly used, room
temperature, liquid hair cleaning and hair conditioning products. Shampooing
does not include the arranging, dressing, waving, coloring, or other treatment
of the hair."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 88B-10.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-10.1. Qualifications for licensing certifying natural hair care specialists.
The Board shall issue a license certificate to practice as a certified natural hair care specialist
to any individual who meets all of the following requirements:
(1) Successful completion of at least 300 hours of a natural hair care curriculum
in an approved cosmetic art school.
(2) Passage of an examination conducted by the Board.
(3) Payment of the fees required by G.S. 88B-20.
A certificate shall not be required to practice as a natural hair care specialist but shall be
required for an individual to hold himself or herself out as or advertise as a certified natural hair
care specialist."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 88B-11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-11. Qualifications for licensing teachers.
…
(e) The Board shall issue a license to practice as a natural hair care teacher to any
individual who meets the requirements of subsection (a) of this section and who meets all of the
following:
(1) Holds in good standing a certified natural hair care license certificate issued
by the Board.
(2) Submits proof of either practice as a certified natural hair care specialist in a
cosmetic art shop or any Board-approved employment capacity in the
cosmetic art industry for a period equivalent to one year of full-time work
immediately prior to application or successful completion of at least 320 hours
of a teacher curriculum in an approved cosmetic art school.
(3) Passes an examination for teachers conducted by the Board."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 88B-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-12. Temporary employment permit; extensions; limits on practice.
(a) The Board shall issue a temporary employment permit to an applicant for licensure
as an apprentice, cosmetologist, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist who meets
all of the following:
(1) Has completed the required hours of a cosmetic art school curriculum in the
area in which the applicant wishes to be licensed.
(2) Has applied to take the examination within three months of completing the
required hours.
(3) Is qualified to take the examination.
(b) A temporary employment permit shall expire six months from the date of graduation
from a cosmetic art school and shall not be renewed.
(c) The holder of a temporary employment permit may practice cosmetic art only under
the supervision of a licensed cosmetologist, manicurist, natural hair care specialist, or esthetician,
as appropriate, and may not operate a cosmetic art shop."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 88B-13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-13. Applicants licensed in other states.
(a) The Board shall issue a license to an applicant licensed as an apprentice,
cosmetologist, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist in another state or a
Senate Bill 656-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
certificate to an applicant licensed or certified as a natural hair care specialist in another state, if
the applicant shows:
(1) The applicant is an active practitioner in good standing.
(2) The applicant has practiced at least one of the three years immediately
preceding the application for a license.license or certificate.
(3) There is no disciplinary proceeding or unresolved complaint pending against
the applicant at the time a license or certificate is to be issued by this State.
(4) The licensure or certification requirements in the state in which the applicant
is licensed or certified are substantially equivalent to those required by this
State.
(b) Instead of meeting the requirements in subsection (a) of this section, any applicant
who is licensed as a cosmetologist, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist in
another state shall be admitted to practice in this State under the same reciprocity or comity
provisions that the state in which the applicant is licensed grants to persons licensed in this State.
Instead of meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, any applicant who is
licensed or certified as a natural hair care specialist in another state may be designated a certified
natural care specialist by the Board under the same reciprocity or comity provisions that the state
in which the applicant is licensed or certified grants to persons certified in this State.
(c) The Board may establish standards for issuing a license to an applicant who is licensed
as a teacher in another state. These standards shall include a requirement that the licensure
requirements in the state in which the teacher is licensed shall be substantially equivalent to those
required in this State and that the applicant shall be licensed by the Board to practice in the area
in which the applicant is licensed to teach."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 88B-14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-14. Licensing of cosmetic art shops.
(a) The Board shall issue a license to operate a cosmetic art shop to any applicant who
submits a properly completed application, on a form approved by the Board, pays the required
fee, and is determined, after inspection, to be in compliance with the provisions of this Chapter
and the Board's rules.
(b) The applicant shall list all licensees and all certified natural hair care specialists who
practice cosmetic art in the shop and shall identify each as an employee or a booth renter.
(c) A cosmetic art shop shall be allowed to operate for a period of 30 days while the
Board inspects and determines the shop's compliance with this Chapter and the Board's rules. If
the Board is unable to complete the inspection within 30 days, the shop will be authorized to
operate until such an inspection can be completed.
(d) A license to operate a cosmetic art shop shall not be transferable from one location to
another or from one owner to another.
(e) A license to operate a cosmetic art shop shall not be required if the cosmetic art
services provided in the shop are exclusively natural hair care, blow-dry styling, or makeup
artistry, and the persons providing these services are exempt from licensure pursuant to
G.S. 88B-25(6). However, if a shop provides natural hair care performed by a certified natural
hair care specialist, the Board may inspect those areas of the shop or booths where certified
natural hair care specialists practice, limited solely to ensuring compliance with any sanitary
management and physical requirements that may be adopted by the Board pursuant to
G.S. 88B-4."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 88B-18 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-18. Examinations.
(a) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-212, s. 2, effective August 8, 2006.
(b) Each examination shall have both a practical and a written portion.
(c) Examinations for applicants for apprentice, cosmetologist, teacher, esthetician,
natural hair care specialist, and manicurist licenses and certified natural hair care specialist
Page 4 Senate Bill 656-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
certificates shall be given in at least three locations in the State that are geographically scattered.
The examinations shall be administered in Board-approved facilities.
(d) An applicant for a cosmetologist, esthetician, manicurist, natural hair care specialist,
or teacher's license or certified natural hair care specialist certificate who fails to pass the
examination three times may not reapply to take the examination again until after the applicant
has successfully completed any additional requirements prescribed by the Board."
SECTION 1.(h) G.S. 88B-20 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-20. Fees required.
(a) The Board may charge the applicant the actual cost of preparation, administration,
and grading of examinations for cosmetologists, apprentices, manicurists, estheticians, certified
natural hair care specialist, specialists, or teachers, in addition to its other fees.
…
(c) The Board may charge license fees as follows:
(1) Cosmetologist .................................................................. $ 39.00 every 3 years
(2) Apprentice ............................................................................... $ 10.00 per year
(3) Esthetician ............................................................................... $ 10.00 per year
(4) Manicurist ............................................................................... $ 10.00 per year
(4a) Natural hair care specialist …………………………………..$ 10.00 per year
(5) Teacher ............................................................................ $ 10.00 every 2 years
(6) Cosmetic art shop per active booth ........................................... $ 3.00 per year
(7) Cosmetic art school ................................................................. $ 50.00 per year
(8) Duplicate license ................................................................................... $ 1.00.
(c1) The Board may charge certification fees as follows:
(1) Certified natural hair care specialist…………………………$ 10.00 per year.
(2) Duplicate certificate……………………………………………………$ 1.00.
(d) The Board may require payment of late fees and reinstatement fees as follows:
(1) Apprentice, certified natural hair care specialist, cosmetologist, esthetician,
manicurist, natural hair care specialist, and teacher late renewal…… $ 10.00
(2) Cosmetic art schools and shops late renewal ……………………….. $ 10.00
(3) Reinstatement – cosmetic art schools and shops …………………….. $ 25.00.
(e) The Board may prorate fees as appropriate."
SECTION 1.(i) G.S. 88B-21 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-21. Renewals; expired licenses; inactive status.
(a) Each license to operate a cosmetic art shop shall be renewed on or before the first day
of February of each year. As provided in G.S. 88B-20, a late fee shall be charged for licenses
renewed after February 1. Any license not renewed by March 1 of each year shall expire. A
cosmetic art shop whose license has been expired for one year or less shall have the license
reinstated immediately upon payment of the reinstatement fee, the late fee, and all unpaid license
fees. The licensee shall submit to the Board, as a part of the renewal process, a list of all licensed
cosmetologists who practice cosmetic art in the shop and shall identify each as an employee or a
booth renter.
(b) Cosmetologist licenses shall be renewed on or before October 1 every three years
beginning October 1, 1998. A late fee shall be charged for renewals after that date. Any license
not renewed shall expire on October 1 of the year that renewal is required. The Board may
develop and implement a plan for staggered license renewal and may prorate license fees to
implement such a plan.
(c) Apprentice, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, and manicurist licenses licenses,
and certified natural hair care specialist certificates shall be renewed annually on or before
October 1 of each year. A late fee shall be charged for the renewal of licenses after that date. Any
license not renewed shall expire on October 1 of that year.
Senate Bill 656-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Teacher licenses shall be renewed every two years on or before October 1. A late fee
shall be charged for the renewal of licenses after that date. Any license not renewed shall expire
on October 1 of that year.
(e) Prior to renewal of a license, license or certificate, a teacher, cosmetologist,
esthetician, certified natural hair care specialist, or manicurist shall annually complete eight hours
of Board-approved continuing education for each year of the licensing cycle. A cosmetologist
may complete up to 24 hours of required continuing education at any time within the
cosmetologist's three-year licensing cycle. Licensees shall submit written documentation to the
Board showing that they have satisfied the requirements of this subsection. A licensee or
certificate holder, if applicable, who is in active practice as a cosmetologist, esthetician, certified
natural hair care specialist, or manicurist, has practiced for at least 10 consecutive years in that
profession, and is 60 years of age or older does not have to meet the continuing education
requirements of this subsection. A licensee who is in active practice as a cosmetologist and has
at least 20 consecutive years of experience as a cosmetologist, does not have to meet the
continuing education requirements of this subsection, but shall report any continuing education
classes completed to the Board, whether the continuing education classes are Board-approved or
not. Promotion of products and systems shall be allowed at continuing education given in-house
or at trade shows. Continuing education classes may also be offered in secondary languages as
needed. No member of the Board may offer continuing education courses as required by this
section.
(f) If an apprentice, cosmetologist, esthetician, manicurist, certified natural hair care
specialist, or teacher fails to renew his or her license or certificate, as applicable, within five years
following the expiration date, the licensee or certificate holder shall be required to pass an
examination as prescribed by the Board before the license or certificate will be reinstated.
(g) Cosmetic art school licenses shall be renewed on or before October 1 of each year. A
late fee shall be charged for licenses renewed after that date. Any license not renewed by
November 1 of that year shall expire. A cosmetic art school whose license has been expired for
one year or less shall have its license reinstated upon payment of the reinstatement fee, the late
fee, and all unpaid license fees.
(h) Upon request by a licensee or certificate holder for inactive status, the Board may
place the licensee's or certificate holder's name on the inactive list so long as the licensee or
certificate holder is in good standing with the Board. An inactive licensee or certificate holder is
not required to complete continuing education requirements. An inactive licensee shall not
practice cosmetic art for consideration. An inactive certificate holder shall not hold themselves
out or advertise as a certified natural hair care specialist while on inactive status but may continue
to practice natural hair care. However, the inactive licensee or certificate holder may continue to
purchase supplies as accorded an active licensee. licensee or certificate holder. When the inactive
licensee or certificate holder desires to be removed from the inactive list and return to active
practice, the inactive licensee or certificate holder shall notify the Board of his or her desire to
return to active status and pay the required fee as determined by the Board. As a condition of
returning to active status, the Board may require the licensee or certificate holder to complete
eight to 24 hours of continuing education pursuant to subsection (e) of this section."
SECTION 1.(j) G.S. 88B-22 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-22. Licenses required; criminal penalty.
(a) Except as provided in this Chapter, no person may practice or attempt to practice
cosmetic art for pay or reward in any form, either directly or indirectly, without being licensed
as an apprentice, cosmetologist, esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist by the
Board.
(b) Except as provided in this Chapter, no person may practice cosmetic art or any part
of cosmetic art, for pay or reward in any form, either directly or indirectly, outside of a licensed
cosmetic art shop.
Page 6 Senate Bill 656-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) No Except as provided in this Chapter, no person may open or operate a cosmetic art
shop in this State unless a license has been issued by the Board for that shop.
(d) An individual licensed as an esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist
may practice only that part of cosmetic art for which the individual is licensed. An individual
certified as a certified natural hair care specialist may practice only natural hair care or services
exempt under this Chapter.
(d1) No person may teach cosmetic art in a Board-approved cosmetic art school unless the
person is a teacher licensed under this Chapter. A guest lecturer may be exempt from the
requirements of this subsection upon approval by the Board.
(d2) Except as provided in this Chapter, no individual may use the title "certified natural
hair care specialist" unless the individual holds a certified natural hair care specialist certificate.
(e) An apprentice licensed under the provisions of this Chapter shall apprentice under the
direct supervision of a cosmetologist. An apprentice shall not operate a cosmetic art shop.
(f) A violation of this Chapter is a Class 3 misdemeanor."
SECTION 1.(k) G.S. 88B-23 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-23. Licenses to be posted.
(a) Every apprentice, cosmetologist, esthetician, manicurist, natural hair care specialist,
and teacher licensed under this Chapter and every certified natural hair care specialist shall
display the certificate of license or certified natural hair care specialist certificate issued by the
Board within the shop in which the person works.
(b) Every certificate of license to operate a cosmetic art shop or school shall be
conspicuously posted in the shop or school for which it is issued."
SECTION 1.(l) G.S. 88B-24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-24. Revocation of licenses and other disciplinary measures.
The Board may restrict, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue, renew, or reinstate any license or
certificate for any of the following:
(1) Conviction of a felony shown by certified copy of the record of the court of
conviction.
(2) Gross malpractice or gross incompetency as determined by the Board.
(3) Advertising by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements.
(4) Permitting any individual to practice cosmetic art without a license or
temporary employment permit, with an expired license or temporary
employment permit, or with an invalid license or temporary employment
permit.permit, if licensure is required under this Chapter.
(5) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license for money or other thing of value
other than the required fee or by fraudulent misrepresentation.
(6) Practicing or attempting to practice by fraudulent misrepresentation.
(7) Willful failure to display a certificate of license or certificate as required by
G.S. 88B-23.
(8) Willful violation of the rules adopted by the Board.
(9) Violation of G.S. 86A-15 G.S. 86B-31 or G.S. 86B-32 by a cosmetologist,
esthetician, natural hair care specialist, or manicurist any person licensed or
certified by the Board and Board, or any person practicing cosmetic art under
an exemption pursuant to G.S. 88B-25(6), while providing cosmetic art
services in a barber shop."
SECTION 1.(m) G.S. 88B-25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-25. Exemptions.
The following persons are exempt from the provisions of this Chapter while engaged in the
proper discharge of their professional duties:
(1) Undertakers and funeral establishments licensed under G.S. 90-210.25.
Senate Bill 656-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Persons authorized to practice medicine or surgery under Chapter 90 of the
General Statutes.
(3) Nurses licensed under Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.
(4) Commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States Army, Air
Force, Navy, Marine, or Coast Guard.
(5) A person employed in a cosmetic art shop whose duties are expressly confined
to the shampooing or blow drying of hair, provided that the person shall
comply with rules adopted by the Board relating to sanitary management of
cosmetic art shops.
(6) A person providing only natural hair care, makeup artistry, or blow-dry
styling, provided the person completes a one-time four-hour course on
sanitation and safety that is offered or approved by the Board prior to
providing services under this exemption. Such person shall maintain a record
of completion of the course in a manner prescribed by the Board. The Board
shall make available at least one qualifying course on its website, free of
charge."

PART II. AUTHORIZED PRACTICE SETTINGS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 88B-15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 88B-15. Practice outside cosmetic art shops.
(a) Any individual licensed or certified under this Chapter Chapter, or any individual
exempt from licensure when providing natural hair care, blow-dry styling, or makeup artistry
pursuant to G.S. 88B-25(6), may visit the residences of individuals who are sick or disabled and
confined to their places of residence in order to attend to their cosmetic needs. A licensed
individual Such individuals may also visit hospitals, nursing homes, rest homes, retirement
homes, mental institutions, correctional facilities, funeral homes, and similar institutions
institutions, and other venues such as event locations to attend to the cosmetic needs of those in
these institutions.receiving services. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit the
locations at which an individual exempt from licensure may provide natural hair care, blow-dry
styling, or makeup artistry.
(b) An Any individual licensed or certified under this Chapter Chapter, or any individual
exempt from licensure pursuant to G.S. 88B-25(6), may practice in a licensed barbershop as
permitted by G.S. 86A-14.G.S. 86B-32."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 86B-32 reads as rewritten:
"§ 86B-32. Persons exempt from the provisions of this Article.
The following persons are exempt from the provisions of this Article while engaged in the
proper discharge of their duties:
(1) Persons authorized under the laws of the State to practice medicine and
surgery, and those working under their supervision.
(2) Commissioned medical or surgical officers of the United States Army or other
components of the Armed Forces of the United States, and those working
under their supervision.
(3) Registered nurses and licensed practical nurses and those working under their
supervision.
(4) Licensed embalmers and funeral directors and those working under their
supervision.
(5) Persons who are working in licensed cosmetic shops or beauty schools and
are licensed by the State Board of Cosmetic Art Examiners pursuant to
Chapter 88B of the General Statutes.
(6) Persons who are working in barbershops and are licensed or otherwise
authorized (certified or exempt from licensure) by the State Board of Cosmetic
Page 8 Senate Bill 656-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Art Examiners pursuant to Chapter 88B of the General Statutes, provided that
those persons shall comply with G.S. 86B-31.
(7) Inmates under the jurisdiction of the North Carolina Department of Adult
Correction.
(8) Persons who are employed by barbershops and whose duties are expressly
confined to the shampooing or blow drying of hair, provided that the person
shall comply with G.S. 86B-31."
SECTION 2.(c) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art
Examiners may adopt rules to implement subsection (a) of this section. The North Carolina Board
of Barber and Electrolysis Examiners may adopt rules to implement subsection (b) of this section.

PART III. TRANSITION, IMPLEMENTATION, AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3.(a) Transition from Licenses to Certificates. – The following provisions
shall govern the transition from natural hair care specialist licenses previously required for
practice under Chapter 88B of the General Statutes to certified natural hair care specialist
certificates, which are voluntary and not required for practice, under this act:
(1) Automatic conversion. – All individuals holding valid natural hair care
specialist licenses issued by the North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art
Examiners as of the effective date of this act shall automatically be deemed to
hold the equivalent certified natural hair care specialist certificates under
Chapter 88B of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, without further
examination, application, fees, or additional qualification requirements. These
certificates confer the title of "certified natural hair care specialist" but are not
required to engage in natural hair care services. Holders of these new
certificates may continue to provide natural hair care services to the same
extent as they did under the previously held licenses, but possession of the
certificate is no longer a condition to practice.
(2) Pending applications. – Any application for a natural hair care specialist
license submitted to the Board prior to the effective date of this act and still
pending on that date shall be processed and granted as an application for a
certified natural hair care specialist certificate, unless the application does not
meet the requirements for certification under Chapter 88B of the General
Statutes, as amended by this act. No resubmission or additional qualifications
shall be required solely because of the change in designation from license to
certificate under this section. Any certificate issued under this subdivision
shall be approved under the same conditions and standards that applied to
licensure immediately prior to the effective date of this act.
(3) Renewal of certificates. – Upon expiration of a natural hair care specialist
license converted into a certificate under subdivision (1) of this section, the
Board shall permit individuals to renew their credential under the standards
applicable to certified natural hair care specialist certificates in accordance
with the renewal provisions of G.S. 88B-21, as amended by this act. Nothing
in this subdivision shall be construed to require an individual to renew the
certificate in order to continue practicing natural hair care services. Renewal
merely maintains the use of the "certified natural hair care specialist"
designation.
SECTION 3.(b) Rulemaking. – The North Carolina Board of Cosmetic Art
Examiners may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this act. The Board shall prominently
post on its publicly available website information about the exemption created by Section 1(m)
of this act, the requirements for completion of the sanitation course necessary for exempt
Senate Bill 656-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
practitioners under G.S. 88B-25(6), and clear instructions for accessing at least one free
Board-approved sanitation course that satisfies these requirements.
SECTION 3.(c) Effective Date. – This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 10 Senate Bill 656-First Edition